Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EVERY THIRD SATURDAY.new text end new text begin (a) $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to Every Third Saturday to provide veterans with emergency assistance. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Every Third Saturday must report to the commissioner of veterans affairs and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over veterans affairs policy and finance no later than September 1, 2026, and by September 1, 2027. Each report must include, at a minimum, a detailed explanation of how the grant money was used and the number of veterans served by the program. new text end